District of Columbia statutes.
31-3136

Penalties.

An action by a health insurer that establishes a pattern or practice of repeated violation of this chapter, as determined by the Commissioner, shall constitute a violation as provided in Chapter 22A of this title.

July 23, 2002, D.C. Law 14-176, § 7, 49 DCR 5086